trunk/morphology/normalizer/spanish-relax.xfst
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # if in lower side {rqu} as {rqa}, {pu} as {pa} etc. -> we want those forms to appear on the upper side as well               #
       # (otherwise rqa/pa would appear as rqu/pu in the output, which would be wrong given the morphological context of these forms #
       # for normalizer: rewrite ru as rqu and ra as rqa, respectivly (TODO: as well yu/yku, ya/yka?                                 #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define rqurqa5 [ {rqa}"+rqu+" <- {rqu}"+rqu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa6 [ {rqu}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa7 [ {rqa}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       
       # define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       # define ykuyka4 [ {yku}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       # define ykuyka5 [ {yka}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       # without Vdim -> else ambiguous with -ykacha
       define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka4 [ {yku}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka5 [ {yka}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       define mpuDIR2 [ {m}"+mu+" <- {mu}"+mu+"  \\  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       define pupa2 [ {pa}"+pu+" <- {pu}"+pu+" \\  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];
       define kuka2 [ {ka}"+ku+" <- {ku}"+ku+" \\  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

      define VerbRulesUpper  naRzpr .o. shortYKU .o. rqurqa5 .o. rqurqa6 .o. rqurqa7 .o. ykuyka3 .o. ykuyka4 .o. ykuyka5 .o. mpuDIR2  .o. pupa2 .o. kuka2 .o. watrans .o. sutrans  .o. portmanteau;

       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # rqu --> rqa before mu, pu , ri ,ysi (rqa can only be +Rptn in this position, everywhere   #
       # else, it's supposed to be NPst                                                            #
       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU" (->) {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* "@KU"];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* "@KU"];      

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -yku becomes -yka before -mu, -pu, -ysi, -chi, -ri, -cha                             #
       # and -na. Seems not always to be the case, therefore, this rule is optional (->)      #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" (->) {yka}"@YKU" || _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YKU" (->) {ya}"@YKU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -mu translocative --> as -m only before pu (might otherwise be confused wth -mpa, positional, -mpu can be written as npu #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> [m|n]"@MU"  ||  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # pu regressive --> pa only before ku and mu                                                   #
       # with -ku: if -na in between pu->pa seems to be optional (?), TODO: check!                    #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupamu [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  ?* "@MU" ];
       define pupaku [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  [{ku}|{ka}]"@KU"];
       define pupanaku [ {pu}"@PU" (->) {pa}"@PU" ||  _  [{naku}|{naka}]"@KU"];
       define pupa pupamu .o. pupaku .o. pupanaku;

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # ku reflexive --> ka before chi and mu and pu (possibley before na (?) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

   define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2  .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2 .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes mi,si,cha as -m,-s,-ch only after vowel. Apply rule to complete word form, after cleanup #
       # of flags, otherwise the context might not be right                                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       #define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> [{m}|{n}]"@MI"  ||Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SIu" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID3 [ {chi}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID4 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];

	define SI1 [  {s}"@SI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define SI2 [  [{si}"@SI"|{sis}"@SIS"] => Cons _  ];

	define MI1 [  {m}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI2 [  {n}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI3 [  [{mi}|{min}]"@MI" => Cons _  ];

	define CHA1 [  {ch}"@CHA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define CHA2 [  {chi}"@CHA"  => Cons _  ];
	#define CHA3 [  {cha}"@CHA" => Cons _  ];
	# doesn't seem to be the case for -cha.... but restrict analysis as -cha to cases where there is a case, possessive or plural suffix to the left, see Feature restrictinos (has to be applied on the upper side!)


       #define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3 .o. EVID4;
	define AmbiRules SI1 .o. SI2 .o. MI1 .o. MI2 .o. MI3 .o. CHA1 .o. CHA2;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               DERIVATION BOUNDARIES                                ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################


      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # 1. special case: last verbal IG: DB before aspect, tense, if present, else before person suffix  #
      # 2. special case: last IG as-suffixes, DB before slot 6 if present, else slot 7                   #
      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define IGverb1  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || "+Prog"%] _  ?* [%["Tns"%]|%["VPers"%]] ];
      define IGverb2  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+NPst"|"+IPst"|"+Prog"]%] _  ?* %["VPers" ];
      define IGas1     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+Top"|"+QTop"|"+Dub"]%] _  ];
      define IGas2     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"] _  ];
define IGRules IGverb1 .o. IGverb2 .o. IGas1 .o. IGas2;


#################################################################################

      #######################
      #                     #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES #
      #                     #
      #######################

      define AS=1 DB @re"as-1.regex" ;
      define AS=2 DB @re"as-2.regex" ;
      define AS=3 DB @re"as-3.regex" ;
      define AS=4 DB @re"as-4.regex" ;
      define AS=5 DB @re"as-5.regex" ;
      define AS=6 DB @re"as-6.regex" ;
      define AS=7 DB @re"as-7.regex" ;
      define HonAff DB @re"hon_aff.regex";

      define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4) (HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] .o. QuechuaOrtho .o. UpperCase;


####################################################################################


       ###########################
       #                         #
       # ADVERBS & CONJUNCTIONS  #
       #                         #
       ###########################
      
      define ADVERBS @re"spanish-adverbs.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
      define CONJUNCTIONS @re"spanish-conj.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
      define PREPOSITIONS @re"spanish-prep.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;

######################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########
      
      define VROOT @re"spanish-verbs.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;

       define V=V=1 @re"v-v-1-guesser.regex" ;
       define V=V=2 @re"v-v-2.regex" ;
       define V=V=3 DB @re"v-v-3.regex" ;
       define V=V=4 DB @re"v-v-4.regex" ;
       define V=V=5 DB @re"v-v-5.regex" ;
       define V=V=6 DB @re"v-v-6-norm.regex" ;
       define V=V=7 @re"v-v-7.regex" ;

    define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper  .o. [(HonAff) V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,5} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff) V=V=6 (V=V=7) (AS)]  .o. VerbRulesLower .o. UpperCase .o. QuechuaOrtho ;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

      define NROOT1 @re"spanish-nouns1.regex" .o. SpanOrtho; #a-f
      define NROOT2 @re"spanish-nouns2.regex" .o. SpanOrtho; #g-z
      define NROOT [NROOT1|NROOT2];
      
      #define NROOT @re"test.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
      


       define N=N=1 @re"n-n-1-guesser.regex" ;
       define N=N=2 DB @re"n-n-2.regex" ;
       #define N=N=3 DB @re"n-n-3-guesser.regex" ;
       define N=N=3 DB @re"n-n-3.regex" ;
       define npers DB @re"npers.regex" ; #nominal transitive forms
       define N=N=4 @re"n-n-4-guesser.regex" ;
       define N=N=5 DB @re"n-n-5.regex" ;
       define N=N=6 DB @re"n-n-6.regex" ;
       define N=N=7 DB @re"n-n-7.regex" ;
       define kamaDist [ "[" "^DB" "]" "[" "--" "]" {kama} "[" "Cas" "]" "[" "+Dist" "]" ] : {kama};
       define spanishPlural1 [ "[" "--" "]" {s} "[" "Num" "]" "[" "+Pl" "]" ] : [{s}"@PLspS"];
       define spanishPlural2 [ "[" "--" "]" {es} "[" "Num" "]" "[" "+Pl" "]" ] : [{es}"@PLspES"];

      define NounSuffixes PossessivPlural .o. [ (spanishPlural1|spanishPlural2) (N=N=1) (HonAff) N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (kamaDist) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (HonAff) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho .o. UpperCase;

     
######################################################################################

      ######################
      #                    #
      # DERIVED ROOTS      #
      #                    #
      ######################
